New.aff
# Subject markers for the near future
PFX K Y 38
PFX K 0 naa .
PFX K 0 munaa .
PFX K 0 onoo .
PFX K 0 onaa .
PFX K 0 anaa .
PFX K 0 tunaa .
PFX K 0 munaa .
PFX K 0 banaa .
PFX K 0 abanaa .
PFX K 0 gunaa .
PFX K 0 ogunaa .
PFX K 0 ginaa .
PFX K 0 eginaa .
PFX K 0 enaa .
PFX K 0 zinaa .
PFX K 0 ezinaa .
PFX K 0 kinaa .
PFX K 0 ekinaa .
PFX K 0 binaa .
PFX K 0 ebinaa .
PFX K 0 linaa .
PFX K 0 elinaa .
PFX K 0 ganaa .
PFX K 0 aganaa .
PFX K 0 kanaa .
PFX K 0 akanaa .
PFX K 0 bunaa .
PFX K 0 obunaa .
PFX K 0 lunaa .
PFX K 0 olunaa .
PFX K 0 zinaa .
PFX K 0 ezinaa .
PFX K 0 kunaa .
PFX K 0 okunaa .
PFX K 0 ganaa .
PFX K 0 ogunaa .
PFX K 0 tunaa .
PFX K 0 otunaa .

# Subject markers for the far future tense
PFX L Y 39
PFX L 0 ndi
PFX L 0 oli .
PFX L 0 ali .
PFX L 0 tuli .
PFX L 0 muli .
PFX L 0 bali .
PFX L 0 abali .
PFX L 0 ali
PFX L 0 bali .
PFX L 0 abali .
PFX L 0 guli .
PFX L 0 oguli .
PFX L 0 gili .
PFX L 0 egili .
PFX L 0 eli .
PFX L 0 zili .
PFX L 0 ezili .
PFX L 0 kili .
PFX L 0 ekili .
PFX L 0 bili .
PFX L 0 ebili .
PFX L 0 lili .
PFX L 0 elili .
PFX L 0 gali .
PFX L 0 agali .
PFX L 0 kali .
PFX L 0 akali .
PFX L 0 buli .
PFX L 0 obuli .
PFX L 0 luli .
PFX L 0 oluli .
PFX L 0 zili .
PFX L 0 ezili .
PFX L 0 kuli .
PFX L 0 okuli .
PFX L 0 gali .
PFX L 0 gali .
PFX L 0 tuli .
PFX L 0 otuli .

# Subject markers for the far future tense in reflexive verbs
# TO-DO Examine "ndibeetaaga" and ndyeetaaga to see whether "Okweetaga" exists in both reflexive and non-reflexive verbs
PFX M Y 36
PFX M 0 ndye
PFX M 0 olye .
PFX M 0 alye .
PFX M 0 tulye .
PFX M 0 mulye .
PFX M 0 balye .
PFX M 0 abalye .
PFX M 0 gulye .
PFX M 0 ogulye .
PFX M 0 gilye .
PFX M 0 egilye .
PFX M 0 elye
PFX M 0 zilye .
PFX M 0 ezilye .
PFX M 0 kilye .
PFX M 0 ekilye .
PFX M 0 bilye .
PFX M 0 ebilye .
PFX M 0 lilye .
PFX M 0 elilye .
PFX M 0 galye .
PFX M 0 agalye .
PFX M 0 kalye .
PFX M 0 akalye .
PFX M 0 bulye .
PFX M 0 obulye .
PFX M 0 lulye .
PFX M 0 olulye .
PFX M 0 zilye .
PFX M 0 ezilye .
PFX M 0 kulye .
PFX M 0 okulye .
PFX M 0 galye .
PFX M 0 agalye .
PFX M 0 tulye .
PFX M 0 otulye .

# object markers
PFX F Y 18
PFX F 0 n [^lmn]
PFX F l nd l.[^mn]
PFX F l nn l.[mn]
PFX F w mp [w]
PFX F 0 mu .
PFX F 0 ba .
PFX F 0 gu .
PFX F 0 gi .
PFX F 0 zi . 
PFX F 0 ki .
PFX F 0 bi .
PFX F 0 li .
PFX F 0 ga .
PFX F 0 ka .
PFX F 0 bu .
PFX F 0 lu .
PFX F 0 ku .
PFX F 0 tu .

# Subject + Object Combinations (Cross Product of E and F)
# Generated via script to handle chaining (e.g., Bazilya)
# TO-DO: Run the generation script and replace the line below with the output

# A special group of object markers in words like A"mwe"kutte Ba"gwe"wadde, Baa"ke"fumbidde
# These markers are reflexive
# In the .dic file, they should be implemented multiple times to cover all tenses and other cases
PFX H Y 15
PFX H 0 bee .
PFX H 0 gwe .
PFX H 0 gye .
PFX H 0 ze .
PFX H 0 kye .
PFX H 0 bye .
PFX H 0 lye .
PFX H 0 ge .
PFX H 0 ke .
PFX H 0 bwe .
PFX H 0 lwe .
PFX H 0 ze .
PFX H 0 kwe .
PFX H 0 ge .
PFX H 0 twe .

# Commented out and considered using modified stems in the .dic file       
# # The very near past tense
# SFX I Y 1
# SFX I a ye [bmpn]a

# TO-DO: Implement tense conjugution for the verb "okuba" (to be) for all the 3 persons
# TO-DO: Implement tense conjugution for the verb "obutaba" (to not be) for all the 3 persons

# Optional vowels at the begining of words
# Commented out because they may increase room for error, I will consider modifying subject markers to handle the optional vowels
# PFX a Y 1
# PFX a 0 a [^aeiou]

# PFX e Y 1
# PFX e 0 e [^aeiou]

# PFX o Y 1
# PFX o 0 o [^aeiou]
